Colorado, session 2026A, HB1025.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-16-103, amend the
introductory portion, (7) introductory portion, (7)(g), and (7)(h); and add
(7)(i) as follows:
6-16-103. Definitions.
As used in this article ARTICLE 16, unless the context otherwise
requires:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(7) "Paid solicitor" means a person who THAT, for monetary
compensation, performs any A service in which contributions will be
solicited in this state by such compensated person or by any PERSON THAT
THE compensated person he or she employs, procures, or engages to solicit
for contributions. The following persons are not "paid solicitors":
(g) A person who THAT prepares a grant application for a charitable
organization or purpose, unless the person's compensation is computed on
the basis of funds FUNDING to be raised or actually raised as a result of the
grant application; or
(h) A person who THAT provides any A service or product to a
charitable organization who does not directly solicit for a charitable
contribution; OR
(i) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES SERVICES AS AN AUCTIONEER TO
A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) (A) IS CONTRACTED OR PAID TO PROVIDE THEIR SERVICES AS AN
AUCTIONEER TO A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION; OR
(B) IS VOLUNTEERING THEIR SERVICES AS AN AUCTIONEER TO A
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION WITHOUT COMPENSATION; AND
(II) DOES NOT DIRECTLY RECEIVE OR HANDLE CONTRIBUTIONS OR
CHARITABLE FUNDING ON BEHALF OF THE CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION FOR
WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL PROVIDES AUCTIONEER SERVICES.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1025

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1025